Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,267
Swimming pools constructed prior to January 1, 1970; operation; requirements.

Swimming pools constructed prior to January 1, 1970, which do not fully comply with design and construction requirements may continue to operate if the equipment and operation of such swimming pool comply with the minimum sanitary and safety requirements.

Laws 1969, c. 760, § 4, p. 2876;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 671;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 582;

R.S.1943, (2018), § 71-4304;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 7;

Laws 2026, LB759, § 28.
July 18, 2026